Massachusetts, session 194th, H1059.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is hereby established, subject to appropriation, a Fisheries
Conservation Gear Grant Program, the purpose of which shall be to provide funding assistance
for the research, development, and acquisition of commercial fishing gear which limits or
eliminates the mortality of juvenile or other fish not legally harvestable, or harm or mortality to
protected species such as the Northern Right Whale, while maximizing the sustainability and
productivity of an affected fishery. The program shall be developed and administered by the
Division of Marine Fisheries, which shall conduct regular hearings at intervals of not less than
once per year, to determine the size, type and scope of such grants necessary to maximize their
effectiveness in achieving the goals set forth in this section. In administering the program, the
division shall utilize eligibility criteria which, to the greatest extent possible, ensure equity based
on geography, fishery type, gear type, and demographic factors, provided further that grants may
be conditioned on matching resources and collaboration between commercial fishery participants
and scientific or other institutions which conduct relevant research.
of 2

SECTION 2. Eligibility for grants from the program shall be restricted to fishing industry
participants domiciled in Massachusetts and holding a valid state or federal commercial fisheries
permit, and institutions of higher learning or research organizations located in the
commonwealth.
SECTION 3.The division may, on behalf of the commonwealth, retain all or a portion of
the ownership of any intellectual property developed through said program, including but not
limited to patents, and registrations, provided, however, that any intellectual property so held
shall be made available through licensure or other means under reasonable terms and conditions
to those otherwise eligible for grant funding pursuant to this act, and for the purposes of this act.
of 2